Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4104
Department; duties; Down syndrome organization; include information on web site.

(1) The department shall make the following information available:

(a) Up-to-date information about Down syndrome that has been reviewed by medical experts and Down syndrome organizations. The information shall be provided in a written format and shall include the following:

(i) A clinical course description, including possible physical, developmental, educational, and psychosocial outcomes;

(ii) Treatment and therapy options; and

(iii) Life expectancy; and

(b) Contact information for Down syndrome organizations that are nonprofit and that provide information and support services for parents, including first-call programs and information hotlines specific to Down syndrome, resource centers or clearinghouses, and other education and support programs for Down syndrome.

(2) The department shall post the information required in subsection (1) of this section on its web site and shall include an information support sheet to be delivered by health care practitioners to parents as prescribed in section 71-4103.

(3) The department shall ensure that the information required in subsection (1) of this section is culturally and linguistically appropriate for parents.

(4) A Down syndrome organization may request that the department include the organization's informational material and contact information on the web site. The department may add the information to the web site upon request.

Laws 2016, LB891, § 4.